Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
BALLOTS

§12-21 Official party ballots. The
primary or special primary ballot shall be clearly designated as such. The
names of the candidates of each party qualifying under section 11-61 or 11-62
and of nonpartisan candidates may be printed on separate ballots, or on a
single ballot. The name of each party and the nonpartisan designation shall be
distinctly printed and sufficiently separate from each other. The names of all
candidates shall be printed on the ballot as provided in section 11-115. When
the names of all candidates of the same party for the same office exceed the
maximum number of voting positions on a single side of a ballot card, the
excess names may be arranged and listed on both sides of the ballot card and
additional ballot cards if necessary. When separate ballots for each party are
not used, the order in which parties appear on the ballot, including
nonpartisan, shall be determined by lot.

The chief election officer or the county clerk,
in the case of county elections, shall approve printed samples or proofs of the
respective party ballots as to uniformity of size, weight, shape, and thickness
prior to final printing of the official ballots. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2; am L
1973, c 217, §2(f); am L 1979, c 139, §7; am L 1981, c 214, §1; am L 1987, c
232, §2]

Attorney General Opinions

Each party's ballot should be separate and severable from the
other parties' ballot, and it is impermissible to place candidates of two minor
parties on opposite faces of a ballot card. Att. Gen. Op. 80-7.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next